Idaho statutes. Title 26 BANKS AND BANKING
Part 3 Provisions Applicable to Mortgage Loan Originators
§ 26-31-316. Investigation and examination authority.

In addition to any authority allowed under this chapter, the director shall have the authority to conduct investigations and examinations as follows:

For purposes of initial licensing, license renewal, license suspension, license conditioning, license revocation or termination, or inquiry or investigation to determine compliance with this part, the director shall have the authority to access, receive and use any books, accounts, records, files, documents, information or evidence including, but not limited to:

Criminal, civil and administrative history information including nonconviction data; and

Personal history and experience information including independent credit reports obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in section 603(p) of the federal fair credit reporting act; and

Any other documents, information or evidence the director deems relevant to the inquiry or investigation, regardless of the location, possession, control or custody of such documents, information or evidence.

For the purposes of investigating violations or complaints arising under this part, or for the purposes of examination, the director may review, investigate or examine any licensee, individual or person subject to this part, as often as necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this part. The director may subpoena or order the attendance of and examine under oath all persons whose testimony may be required about the loans or the business or subject matter of any such examination or investigation, and may subpoena or order such person to produce books, accounts, records, files and any other documents the director deems relevant to the inquiry.

Each licensee, individual or other person subject to this part shall make available to the director upon request the books and records relating to the operations of such licensee, individual or other person subject to this part. The director may interview the licensee’s employer, its employees and agents, its independent contractors, its officers and principals, other mortgage loan originators, agents and customers of the licensee, individual or other person subject to this part. For the purposes of this section, the director shall have free access to the books and records of such persons.

Each licensee, individual or other person subject to this part shall make or compile reports or prepare other information as directed by the director in order to carry out the purposes of this part including, but not limited to:

Accounting compilations;

Information lists and data concerning loan transactions in a format prescribed by the director; and

Such other information deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

In making any examination or investigation authorized by this part, the director may control access to any documents and records of the licensee or other person under examination or investigation. The director may take possession of the documents and records or place a person in exclusive charge of the documents and records in the place where they are usually kept. During the period of control, no individual or person shall remove or attempt to remove any of the documents and records except pursuant to a court order or with the consent of the director. Unless the director has reasonable grounds to believe the documents or records of the licensee or other person have been, or are at risk of being altered or destroyed for the purpose of concealing a violation of this chapter, the licensee or owner of the documents and records shall have access to the documents and records as necessary to conduct its ordinary business affairs.
(6) In order to carry out the purposes of this section, the director may:

Retain attorneys, accountants or other professionals and specialists as examiners, auditors or investigators to conduct or assist in the conduct of examinations or investigations;

Enter into agreements or relationships with other government officials or regulatory associations in order to improve efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by sharing resources, standardized or uniform methods or procedures, and documents, records, information or evidence obtained under this section;

Use, hire, contract or employ public or privately available analytical systems, methods or software to examine or investigate the licensee, individual or other person subject to this part;

Accept and rely on examination or investigation reports made by other government officials, including those inside and outside the state of Idaho; and

Accept and rely upon audit reports made by an independent certified public accountant for the licensee, individual or other person subject to this part. The director may incorporate the audit report in the examination report, investigation report or other writing of the director.

(7) The authority of this section shall remain in effect, whether such a licensee, individual or other person subject to this part acts or claims to act under any licensing or registration law of this state, or claims to act without such authority.

(8) No licensee, individual or other person subject to investigation or examination under this section may knowingly withhold, abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy or secrete any books, records, computer records or other information requested by the director.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-316, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-317. Prohibited acts and practices.

It is a violation of this part for a person or individual subject to this part, in connection with mortgage loan origination activity in this state, to:

Directly or indirectly employ any scheme, device or artifice to defraud or mislead borrowers or lenders or to defraud any person;

Engage in any unfair or deceptive practice;

Obtain property by fraud or misrepresentation;

Solicit or enter into a contract with a borrower that provides that the person or individual subject to this part may earn a fee or commission through “best efforts” to obtain a loan, even though no loan is actually obtained for the borrower;

Solicit, advertise or enter into a contract for specific interest rates, points or other financing terms, unless the terms are actually available at the time of soliciting, advertising or contracting;

Conduct any business covered by this part without holding a valid license as required under this part, or assist or aid and abet any person in the conduct of business under this part who does not hold a valid license as required under this part;

Fail to make disclosures as required by this part or any other applicable state or federal law including rules or regulations promulgated thereunder;

Fail to comply with provisions of this part or rules promulgated under this part, or fail to comply with any other state or federal law, including the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, applicable to any business authorized or conducted under this part;

Make any false or deceptive statement or representation, including a false or deceptive statement or representation concerning rates, points or other financing terms or conditions for a residential mortgage loan, or engage in bait and switch advertising;

Negligently make any false statement or knowingly and willfully omit a material fact in connection with any information or reports filed with a government agency or the NMLSR or in connection with any investigation conducted by the director or another governmental agency;

Make any payment, threat or promise, directly or indirectly, to any person for the purpose of influencing the independent judgment of the person in connection with a residential mortgage loan, or make any payment, threat or promise, directly or indirectly, to any appraiser of a property, for the purpose of influencing the independent judgment of the appraiser with respect to the value of the property;

Collect, charge, attempt to collect or charge, or use or propose any agreement purporting to collect or charge any fee prohibited by this part;

Cause or require a borrower to obtain property insurance coverage in an amount that exceeds the replacement cost of the improvements as established by the property insurer;

Fail to truthfully account for moneys belonging to a party to a residential mortgage loan transaction;

Be employed simultaneously by more than one (1) mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensed or required to be licensed under part 2 of this chapter;

Enter into concurrent contractual relationships for delivery of mortgage loan origination services to more than one (1) mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensed or required to be licensed under part 2 of this chapter;

Obtain any exclusive dealing or exclusive agency agreement from any borrower;

Delay closing of any residential mortgage loan for the purpose of increasing interest, costs, fees or charges payable by the borrower;

Accept any fees at closing which were not previously disclosed fully to the borrower;

Obtain any agreement or instrument in which blanks are left to be filled in after signing by a borrower;

Enter into any agreement, with or without the payment of a fee, to fix in advance a particular interest rate or other term in a residential mortgage loan unless written confirmation of the agreement is delivered to the borrower as required by rule pursuant to this chapter;

Violate standards of conduct adopted by the NMLSR applicable to a person taking a written test administered pursuant to section 26-31-308, Idaho Code, as found by the director; or

Obtain or attempt to obtain credit for education required pursuant to section 26-31-307 or 26-31-310, Idaho Code, by means of false pretenses or representations.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-317, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 20, p. 142.

§ 26-31-318. Unlawful acts.

Any person, not exempt under the provisions of this part, who engages in mortgage loan origination activities without first obtaining a mortgage loan originator license or without first registering as a mortgage loan originator in accordance with the requirements of this part, shall be guilty of a felony.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-318, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-319. Nonfederally insured credit unions.

Nonfederally insured credit unions which employ loan originators, as defined in P.L. 110-289, shall register such loan originators with the NMLSR by furnishing the information concerning the loan originators’ identities set forth in section 1507(a)(2), P.L. 110-289.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-319, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-320. Unique identifier disclosure.

The unique identifier of any person engaged in the origination of a residential mortgage loan shall be clearly displayed on all residential mortgage loan application forms, solicitations or advertisements, including business cards, websites and other forms of media, and any other document required by rule promulgated under this chapter or order issued by the director under this chapter and pertinent to this part.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-320, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 21, p. 142.

§ 26-31-321. Severability.

The provisions of this act are hereby declared to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this act.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-321, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.